Alabama, session 2026rs, HB514.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) Beginning June 1, 2026, the Sheriff of
Tuscaloosa County shall receive an additional expense
allowance of thirty-six thousand dollars ($36,000) per year,
payable in equal monthly installments from the county general
fund. This expense allowance shall be in addition to all other
expense allowances or other forms of compensation and shall be
treated as compensation for retirement contributions.
(b) This subsection shall be void upon the next vacancy
in the Office of the Sheriff of Tuscaloosa County.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on June 1,
2026.
Page 1

2026.
HB514 Enrolled









________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives



________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate


House of Representatives

I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
was passed by the House 05-Mar-26.

John Treadwell
Clerk





Senate 31-Mar-26 Passed



Page 2